Utah statutes.
41-6a-217.   Volunteers may be authorized to enforce certain parking provisions.

(1)  Any law enforcement agency authorized to enforce parking laws in this state may appoint volunteers to issue citations for violations of:

(a)  the provisions of Subsections 41-1a-414(3) and (4) related to parking for a person with a disability;

(b)  any municipal or county accessible parking privileges ordinance for a person with a disability; or

(c)  the provisions of Subsection 41-6a-1307(4) related to parking in a school bus parking zone.

(2)  A volunteer appointed under this section must be at least 21 years of age.

(3)  The law enforcement agency appointing a volunteer may establish any other qualification for the volunteer that the agency finds desirable.

(4)  A volunteer may not issue citations until the volunteer has received training from the appointing law enforcement agency.

(5)  A citation issued by a volunteer under this section has the same force and effect as a citation issued by a peace officer for the same offense.

